analyzer/noun.lexc
! noun.lexc
!
! This lexicon lists regular nouns.
!
! We use lexc as a simple lexical listing mechanism, and
! concatenate the morphotactics in the xfst code.
! However, it can handle more here. For example, it is common to 
! define the morphotactics by replacing the end-of-word '#' symbol
! below with additional 'LEXICONS' which are concatenated to the root
! LEXICON.
! 
!
LEXICON Root
cat     #;
cow     #;
bat     #;
fox     #;
finch   #;
fish    #;
butterfly   #;
turkey  #;
